Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 76A. Historic Downtown Development

§ 2790.
Legislative policy and purpose.

The General Assembly finds that:

Economically strong downtowns are critical to the health and well-being of Vermont’s communities and that downtowns are the natural location for both small businesses and other uses that together constitute the diverse fabric of communities that define Vermont’s quality of life.

Vermont’s distinctive character of historic downtowns and villages surrounded by working landscapes is recognized worldwide. This character defines Vermont’s image, economy, and sense of place as well as its community spirit and identity, which are enjoyed by residents and visitors alike. This distinctive character is among our most valuable assets, and investing in its health is a critical component of the State’s overall economic well-being. The General Assembly recognizes the particular importance of Vermont’s downtowns as historic regional centers providing services and amenities to nonresidents and further recognizes their need for targeted support in avoiding continued loss of commercial and residential land use to the surrounding area.

Investments made to revitalize the State’s historic downtowns and village centers, to encourage pedestrian-oriented development within and around the commercial core, and to build upon the State’s traditional settlement patterns support statewide goals concerning energy conservation, the efficient use of transportation and other public infrastructure and services, the protection of the working landscape, and the promotion of healthy lifestyles.

Strategies, programs, and investments that advance smart growth principles today will result in the long-term fiscal, economic, cultural, and environmental viability of the State.

It is therefore the intent of the General Assembly to:

support historic downtowns and villages by providing funding, training, and resources to communities designated under this chapter, to revitalize such communities, to increase and diversify economic development activities, to improve the efficient use of public investments, including water and sewer systems, and to safeguard working landscapes;

improve the ability of Vermont’s historic downtowns and villages to attract residents and businesses by enhancing their livability and unique sense of place; by expanding access to employment, housing, education and schools, services, public facilities, and other basic needs; and by expanding businesses’ access to markets;

coordinate policies and leverage funding to support historic downtowns and villages by removing barriers to collaboration among local downtown organizations, municipal departments, local businesses, and local nonprofit organizations and increasing accountability and effectiveness at all levels of government to revitalize communities and plan for future growth;

promote healthy, safe, and walkable downtown and village neighborhoods for people of all ages and incomes by increasing investments in those locations; providing energy efficient housing that is closer to jobs, services, health care, stores, entertainment, and schools; and reducing the combined cost of housing and transportation;

encourage investment in mixed use development and provide for diverse housing options within walking distance of historic downtowns and villages that reinforce Vermont’s traditional settlement patterns and meet the needs of community members of all social and economic groups;

develop safe, reliable, and economical transportation options in historic downtowns and villages to decrease household transportation costs, promote energy independence, improve air quality, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, and promote public health; and

reflect Vermont’s traditional settlement patterns, and to minimize or avoid strip development or other unplanned development throughout the countryside on quality farmland or important natural and cultural landscapes.

[Repealed.]

The General Assembly finds that Vermont’s communities face challenges as they seek to accommodate growth and development while supporting the economic vitality of the State’s downtowns, village centers, and new town centers and maintaining the rural character and working landscape of the surrounding countryside. While it is the intention of the General Assembly to give the highest priority to facilitating development and growth in downtowns and village centers whenever feasible, when that is not feasible, the General Assembly further finds that:

A large percentage of future growth should occur within duly designated growth centers that have been planned by municipalities in accordance with smart growth principles and Vermont’s planning and development goals pursuant to section 4302 of this title.

Designated growth centers, if properly located and scaled, will serve to support the State’s downtowns, village centers, and new town centers by encouraging new residential neighborhoods and compatible civic, commercial, and industrial uses to locate within proximity to historic community centers.

Designated growth centers will provide a cost-effective means of allocating and targeting limited municipal and State resources to those areas specifically planned to accommodate and support concentrated development and a large percentage of future growth.

Designated growth centers will provide a mechanism for concentrating private investment in those areas targeted for growth and development through public investments and incentives, and by establishing a process that will effectively reduce cost and delay in the permitting and approval of development.

Designated growth centers will accomplish these goals if they are economically viable, they are appropriately planned to accommodate future growth needs and a mix of uses, they originate at the municipal or regional level, and they are recognized by the State under State planning, financing, and permitting programs.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2005, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 59

, § 1.

§ 2791.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Community reinvestment agreement” means an agreement among municipal government officials, business leaders, and community groups pursuant to subdivision 2793(b)(2) of this title.

“Design review district” means a district created pursuant to subdivision 4414(1)(E) of this title.

“Downtown” means the traditional central business district of a community that has served as the focus of socio-economic interaction in the community, characterized by a cohesive core of commercial and mixed use buildings, some of which may contain mixed use spaces, often interspersed with civic, religious, residential, and industrial buildings and public spaces, typically arranged along a main street and intersecting side streets that are within walking distance for residents who live within and surrounding the core and that are served by public infrastructure such as sidewalks and public transit. Downtowns are typically larger in scale than village centers and are characterized by a development pattern that is consistent with smart growth principles.

“Downtown development district” or “downtown district” means a district delineated by the municipality and designated by the Downtown Development Board under section 2793 of this title.

“Local downtown organization” means either a nonprofit corporation, including a nonprofit corporation established by the Vermont Economic Development Authority, or a board, council, or commission created by the legislative body of the municipality, whose primary purpose is to administer and implement the community reinvestment agreement and other matters regarding the revitalization of the downtown district under subdivision 2793(b)(2) of this title.

“Historic district” means a district created pursuant to subdivision 4414(1)(F) of this title.

“Certified historic structure” means a certified historic structure as defined in the Internal Revenue Code,

26 U.S.C. § 47(c)

.

“Special assessment” means a tax assessment pursuant to chapter 87 of this title or a municipal charter, among all commercial owners, or a significant portion thereof, within a downtown development district to impose an incremental tax assessment above the amount otherwise assessed, for the purposes of supporting downtown interests.

“Tax stabilization agreement” means a contract executed pursuant to either section 2741 of this title or

32 V.S.A. § 5404a

to provide a stable and predictable tax rate or assessment on properties in a downtown development district.

“Village center” means the core of a traditional settlement, typically comprised of a cohesive mix of residential, civic, religious, commercial, and mixed use buildings arranged along a main street and intersecting streets that are within walking distance for residents who live within and surrounding the core. Industrial uses may be found within or immediately adjacent to these centers. Village centers are typically smaller in scale than downtowns and are characterized by a development pattern that is consistent with smart growth principles.

“New town center” means the area planned for or developing as a community’s central business district, composed of compact, pedestrian-friendly, multistory, and mixed use development that is characteristic of a traditional downtown, supported by planned or existing urban infrastructure, including curbed streets with sidewalks and on-street parking, stormwater treatment, sanitary sewers, and public water supply.

“Growth center” shall have the same meaning as under section 2793c of this title.

“Smart growth principles” means growth that:

Maintains the historic development pattern of compact village and urban centers separated by rural countryside.

Develops compact mixed-use centers at a scale appropriate for the community and the region.

Enables choice in modes of transportation.

Protects the State’s important environmental, natural, and historic features, including natural areas, water quality, scenic resources, and historic sites and districts.

Serves to strengthen agricultural and forest industries and minimizes conflicts of development with these industries.

Balances growth with the availability of economic and efficient public utilities and services.

Supports a diversity of viable businesses in downtowns and villages.

Provides for housing that meets the needs of a diversity of social and income groups in each community.

Reflects a settlement pattern that, at full build-out, is not characterized by:

scattered development located outside compact urban and village centers that is excessively land consumptive;

development that limits transportation options, especially for pedestrians;

the fragmentation of farmland and forestland;

development that is not serviced by municipal infrastructure or that requires the extension of municipal infrastructure across undeveloped lands in a manner that would extend service to lands located outside compact village and urban centers;

linear development along well-traveled roads and highways that lacks depth, as measured from the highway.

“Important natural resources” means headwaters, streams, shorelines, floodways, rare and irreplaceable natural areas, necessary wildlife habitat, wetlands, endangered species, productive forestlands, and primary agricultural soils, all of which are as defined in 10 V.S.A. chapter 151.

(16)

“Neighborhood planning area” shall have the same meaning as under section 2793e of this title.

(17)

“Neighborhood development area” shall have the same meaning as under section 2793e of this title.

(18)

“Department” means the Vermont Department of Housing and Community Development.

(19)

“District coordinator” means a district environmental coordinator attached to a District Commission established under 10 V.S.A. chapter 151.

(20)

“Infill” means the use of vacant land or property within a built-up area for further construction or development.

Subdivision (15) repealed effective July 1, 2018; see note set out below.“Vermont neighborhood” means an area of land that is in a municipality with an approved plan, a confirmed planning process, zoning bylaws, and subdivision regulations, and is in compliance with all the following:

Is located in one of the following:

a designated downtown, village center, new town center, or growth center; or

an area of land that is within the municipality and outside but contiguous to a designated downtown, village center, or new town center and is not more than 100 percent of the total acreage of the designated downtown, 50 percent of the village center, or 75 percent of the new town center.

Contains substantially all the following characteristics:

Its contiguous land, if any, complements the existing downtown district, village center, or new town center by integrating new housing units with existing residential neighborhoods, commercial and civic services and facilities, and transportation networks, and is consistent with smart growth principles.

It is served by either a municipal sewer infrastructure or a community or alternative wastewater system approved by the Agency of Natural Resources.

It incorporates minimum residential densities of no fewer than four units of single-family, detached dwelling units per acre, and higher densities for duplexes and multi-family housing.

It incorporates neighborhood design standards that promote compact, pedestrian-oriented development patterns and networks of sidewalks or paths for both pedestrians and bicycles that connect with adjacent development areas.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2001, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 28, 2002;

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 78, eff. Jan. 31, 2005;

2005, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2007, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 28, 2008;

2009, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 59

, § 2;

2013, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 27, 2014.

§ 2792.
Vermont Downtown Development Board.

A “Vermont Downtown Development Board,” also referred to as the “State Board,” is created to administer the provisions of this chapter. The State Board shall be composed of the following members or their designees:

The Secretary of Commerce and Community Development.

The Secretary of Transportation.

The Secretary of Natural Resources.

The Commissioner of Public Safety.

The State Historic Preservation Officer.

A person appointed by the Governor from a list of three names submitted by the Vermont Natural Resources Council and the Preservation Trust of Vermont.

A person appointed by the Governor from a list of three names submitted by the Association of Chamber Executives.

Three public members representative of local government, one of whom shall be designated by the Vermont League of Cities and Towns, and two shall be appointed by the Governor.

A member of the Vermont Planners Association (VPA) designated by the Association.

The Chair of the Natural Resources Board or a representative of the Natural Resources Board designated by the Chair.

A representative of a regional planning commission designated by the Vermont Association of Planning and Development Agencies (VAPDA) and an alternate representative designated by VAPDA to enable all applications to be considered by a representative from a regional planning commission other than the one of which the applicant municipality is a member. The alternate designated by VAPDA may vote only when the designated representative does not vote.

[Repealed.]

The State Board shall elect a chair and vice chair from among its membership.

The Department shall provide staff and administrative support to the State Board and shall produce guidelines to direct municipalities seeking to obtain designation under this chapter.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2005, No. 8

, § 6b, eff. April 25, 2005;

2005, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2007, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 16, 2008;

2007, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. May 28, 2008;

2009, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 11

, § 25;

2013, No. 59

, § 3.

§ 2793.
Designation of downtown development districts.

A municipality, by its legislative body, may apply to the State Board for designation of a downtown area within that municipality as a downtown development district.

For applications filed on and after July 1, 2014, the intention to apply for designation under this section shall be included in the plan of the municipality, and the plan shall explain how the designation would further the plan’s goals and the goals of section 4302 of this title.

A preapplication meeting shall be held with Department staff to review the program requirements and to preliminarily identify possible designation boundaries. The meeting shall be held in the municipality unless another location is agreed to by the municipality.

An application by a municipality shall contain a map that accurately delineates the district and is consistent with the guidelines produced by the Department under subsection 2792(d) of this title. The application shall also include evidence that the regional planning commission and the regional development corporation have been notified of the municipality’s intent to apply, evidence that the municipality has published notice of its application in a local newspaper of general circulation within the municipality, and information showing that the district meets the standards for designation established in subsection (b) of this section. Upon receipt of an application, the State Board shall provide written notice of the application to the Natural Resources Board. The Natural Resources Board and interested persons shall have 15 days after notice to submit written comments regarding the application before the State Board issues a written decision that demonstrates the applicant’s compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

Within 45 days of receipt of a completed application, the State Board shall designate a downtown development district if the State Board finds in its written decision that the municipality has:

Demonstrated a commitment to protect and enhance the historic character of the downtown through the adoption of a design review district, through the adoption of an historic district, through the adoption of regulations that adequately regulate the physical form and scale of development that the State Board determines substantially meet the historic preservation requirements in subdivisions 4414(1)(E) and (F) of this title, or through the creation of a development review board authorized to undertake local Act 250 reviews of municipal impacts pursuant to section 4420 of this title.

Provided a community reinvestment agreement that has been executed by the authorized representatives of the municipal government, business and property owners within the district, and community groups with an articulated purpose of supporting downtown interests, and that contains the following provisions:

A delineation of the area that meets the requirements set forth in subdivision 2791(3) of this title and that is part of or contains a district that is listed or eligible for listing on the National Register of Historic Places pursuant to

16 U.S.C. § 470a

.

A capital budget and program pursuant to section 4430 of this title to improve or preserve public infrastructure within the district, including facilities for public transit, parking, pedestrian amenities, lighting, and public space.

A source of funding and resources necessary to fulfill the community reinvestment agreement, demonstrated by a commitment by the legislative body of the municipality to implement at least one of the following:

a special assessment district created to provide funding to the downtown district;

authority to enter into a tax stabilization agreement for the purposes of economic development in a downtown district;

a commitment to implement a tax incremental financing district pursuant to subchapter 5 of chapter 53 of this title; or

other multiple-year financial commitments among the parties subject to the approval of the State Board.;

An organizational structure necessary to sustain a comprehensive long-term downtown revitalization effort, including a local downtown organization as defined under subdivision 2791(5) of this title that will collaborate with municipal departments, local businesses, and local nonprofit organizations:

to enhance the physical appearance and livability of the downtown district by implementing local policies that promote the use and rehabilitation of historic and existing buildings, by developing pedestrian-oriented design requirements, by encouraging new development and infill that satisfy such design requirements, and by supporting long-term planning that is consistent with the goals set forth in section 4302 of this title;

to build consensus and cooperation among the many groups and individuals who have a role in the planning, development, and revitalization process;

to market the assets of the downtown district to customers, potential investors, new businesses, local citizens, and visitors;

to strengthen, diversify, and increase the economic activity within the downtown district;

to recognize and incorporate the map of the designated downtown district into the next update of the municipal plan; and

to measure annually progress and achievements of the revitalization efforts as required by Department guidelines developed pursuant to subsection 2792(d) of this title.

Evidence that any private or municipal sewage system and private or public water supply serving the proposed downtown district is in compliance with the requirements of 10 V.S.A. chapters 47 and 56 and has adequately demonstrated an intent to reserve sufficient wastewater and water allocations to serve the future needs of the designated areas. Any municipality proposing a municipal sewage system and public water supply to serve the proposed downtown district shall provide evidence to the State Board of a commitment to construct or maintain such a system and supply in compliance with requirements of 10 V.S.A. chapters 47 and 56, or a commitment to construct, as applicable, a permittable potable water supply, wastewater system, indirect discharge, or public water supply within no more than ten years. A commitment to construct does not relieve the property owners in the district from meeting any applicable statute, rule, or bylaw regarding wastewater systems, potable water supplies, public water supplies, indirect discharges, and the subdivision of land.

A planning process confirmed under section 4350 of this title.

A designation issued under this section shall be effective for eight years and may be renewed on application by the municipality. The State Board also shall review a community’s designation four years after issuance or renewal and may review compliance with the designation requirements at more frequent intervals. Any community applying for renewal shall explain how the designation under this section has furthered the goals of the town plan and shall submit an approved town plan map that depicts the boundary of the designated district. If at any time the State Board determines that the downtown development district no longer meets the standards for designation established in subsection (b) of this section, it may take any of the following actions:

require corrective action;

provide technical assistance through the Vermont Downtown Program;

limit eligibility for the benefits established in section 2794 of this chapter without affecting any of the district’s previously awarded benefits; or

remove the district’s designation without affecting any of the district’s previously awarded benefits.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2001, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1a-3, eff. May 28, 2002;

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 79, eff. Jan. 31, 2005;

2007, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 16, 2008;

2013, No. 59

, § 4;

2017, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 2793a.
Designation of village centers by State Board.

A town that has a duly adopted and approved plan and a planning process that is confirmed in accordance with section 4350 of this title may apply to the State Board for designation of one or more of its village centers. If an incorporated village of a town has an approved municipal plan and a planning process independently confirmed in accordance with section 4350 of this title, the incorporated village shall be the applicant for designation of its village center.

For applications filed on and after July 1, 2014, the intention to apply for designation under this section shall be included in the plan of the municipality, and the plan shall explain how the designation would further the plan’s goals and the goals of section 4302 of this title.

A preapplication meeting shall be held with Department staff to review the program requirements and to preliminarily identify possible designation boundaries. The meeting shall be held in the municipality unless another location is agreed to by the municipality.

An application for designation under this section must include a map that delineates the boundaries of the village center consistent with the definition of “village center” provided in subdivision 2791(10) of this title and evidence that notice has been given to the regional planning commission and the regional development corporation of the intent to apply for this designation. The map shall be consistent with the guidelines produced by the Department under subsection 2792(d) of this title.

Within 45 days of receipt of a completed application, the State Board shall designate a village center if the State Board finds the applicant has met the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

A village center designated by the State Board pursuant to subsection (a) of this section is eligible for the following development incentives and benefits:

Provided the proposal is eligible, priority consideration for municipal planning funds under section 4306 of this title for projects that are related to the designated village center.

Inclusion of a village center, as defined in this chapter, as a priority growth center in the State’s consolidated plan for housing and community development programs.

The authority to create a special taxing district pursuant to chapter 87 of this title for the purpose of financing both capital and operating costs of a project within the boundaries established through village center designation.

The following State tax credits for projects located in a designated village center:

A State historic rehabilitation tax credit of ten percent under

32 V.S.A. § 5930cc(a)

that meets the requirements for the federal rehabilitation tax credit.

A State fagade improvement tax credit of 25 percent under

32 V.S.A. § 5930cc(b)

.

A State code improvement tax credit of 50 percent under

32 V.S.A. § 5930cc(c)

.

Whenever the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services or other State officials in charge of selecting a site are planning to lease or construct buildings suitable to being located in a village center after determining that the option of utilizing existing space in a downtown development district pursuant to subdivision 2794(a)(12) of this title is not feasible, the option of utilizing existing space in a designated village center shall be given thorough investigation and priority, in consultation with the community.

The State Board shall review a village center designation every eight years and may review compliance with the designation requirements at more frequent intervals. Any community applying for renewal shall explain how the designation under this section has furthered the goals of the town plan and shall submit an approved town plan map that depicts the boundary of the designated district. If at any time the State Board determines that the village center no longer meets the standards for designation established in subsection (a) of this section, it may take any of the following actions:

require corrective action;

provide technical assistance through the Vermont Downtown Program;

limit eligibility for the benefits pursuant to subsection (c) of this section without affecting any of the village center’s previously awarded benefits; or

remove the village center’s designation without affecting any of the village center’s previously awarded benefits.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 28, 2002; amended

2003, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. June 12, 2004;

2005, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2007, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 16, 2008;

2013, No. 59

, § 5;

2017, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 2793b.
Designation of new town center development districts.

A municipality, by its legislative body, may apply to the State Board for designation of an area within that municipality as a new town center development district, provided no traditional downtown or new town center already exists in that municipality.

The State Board shall not approve an application filed by a municipality on or after July 1, 2014 unless the municipality has stated in its town plan that it intends to apply for designation under this section, and the town plan explains how the designation would further the plan’s goals and the goals of section 4302 of this title.

A preapplication meeting shall be held with Department staff before an application is filed to review the program requirements and to identify possible designation boundaries. The meeting shall be held in the municipality unless another location is agreed to by the municipality.

An application for designation shall contain a map that delineates the boundaries of the proposed district and is consistent with the guidelines produced by the Department under subsection 2792(d) of this title. The application shall also demonstrate that the proposed district meets the requirements set forth in subdivision 2791(11) of this title, as well as the standards for designation established in subsection (b) of this section. The application shall verify that the regional planning commission and the regional development corporation have been notified of the municipality’s intent to apply for designation.

Within 45 days of receipt of a completed application, the State Board shall designate a new town center development district if the State Board finds, with respect to that district, the municipality has:

A confirmed planning process under section 4350 of this title, developed a municipal center plan, and adopted bylaws and ordinances that implement the plan, including an official map, and a design review district created under this title or other regulations that adequately control the physical form and scale of development.

Provided a community investment agreement that has been executed by authorized representatives of the municipal government, businesses and property owners within the district, and community groups with an articulated purpose of supporting downtown interests, and contains the following:

A map of the designated new town center. The total area of land encompassed within a designated new town center shall not exceed 125 acres. In a municipality with a population greater than 15,000, the total area of land encompassed within a designated new town center may include land in excess of 125 acres provided that the additional area is needed to facilitate the redevelopment of predominately developed land in accordance with the smart growth principles defined under subdivision 2791(13) of this title and shall not exceed 175 acres.

Regulations enabling high densities that are greater than those allowed in any other part of the municipality.

Regulations enabling multistory and mixed use buildings and mixed uses which enable the development of buildings in a compact manner.

A capital improvement program, or a capital budget and program under this title, showing a clear plan for providing public infrastructure within the center, including facilities for drinking water, wastewater, stormwater, public space, lighting, and transportation, including public transit, parking, and pedestrian amenities.

A clear plan for mixed income housing in the new town center.

Evidence that civic and public buildings do exist, or will exist in the center, as shown by the capital improvement plan or the capital budget and program, and the official map.

[Repealed.]

Evidence that any private or municipal sewage system and private or public water supply serving the proposed new town center are in compliance with the requirements of 10 V.S.A. chapters 47 and 56, and that the municipality has dedicated a portion of any unallocated reserve capacity of the sewage and public water supply necessary to support growth within the proposed new town center. Any municipality proposing a municipal sewage system and public water supply to serve the proposed new town center shall provide evidence to the State Board of a commitment to construct or maintain such a system and supply in compliance with requirements of 10 V.S.A. chapters 47 and 56, or a commitment to construct, as applicable, a permittable potable water supply, wastewater system, indirect discharge, or public water supply within no more than ten years. A commitment to construct does not relieve the property owners in the new town center from meeting the applicable regulations of the Agency of Natural Resources regarding wastewater systems, potable water supplies, public water supplies, indirect discharges, and the subdivision of land. In the event a municipality fails in its commitment to construct a municipal sewage system or public water supply, or both, the State Board shall revoke designation, unless the municipality demonstrates to the State Board that all good faith efforts were made and continue to be made to obtain the required approvals and permits from the Agency of Natural Resources, and failure to construct was due to unavailability of sufficient State or federal funding.

Upon designation by the State Board under this section as a new town center, a new town center and projects in a new town center shall be eligible for the authority to create a special taxing district, pursuant to chapter 87 of this title, for the purpose of financing both capital and operating costs of a project within the boundaries established through new town center designation.
(c) (1) Upon designation by the State Board under this section as a new town center, a new town center and projects in a new town center shall be eligible for the authority to create a special taxing district, pursuant to chapter 87 of this title, for the purpose of financing both capital and operating costs of a project within the boundaries established through new town center designation.

Whenever the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services or other State officials in charge of selecting a site are planning to lease or construct buildings suitable to being located in a new town center after determining that the option of utilizing existing space in a downtown development district, pursuant to subdivision 2794(a)(12) of this title, is not feasible, the option of utilizing existing space in a designated new town center shall be given thorough investigation and priority, in consultation with the community.

A designation issued under this section shall be effective for eight years and may be renewed on application by the municipality. The State Board also shall review a new town center designation four years after issuance or renewal and may review compliance with the designation requirements at more frequent intervals. The State Board may adjust the schedule of review under this subsection to coincide with the review of a related growth center. If at any time the State Board determines the new town center no longer meets the standards for designation established in subsection (b) of this section, it may take any of the following actions:

require corrective action;

provide technical assistance through the Vermont Downtown Program;

limit eligibility for the benefits pursuant to subsection (c) of this section without affecting any of the new town center’s previously awarded benefits; or

remove the new town center’s designation without affecting any of the town center’s previously awarded benefits.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 4a, eff. May 28, 2002; amended

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 80, eff. Jan. 31, 2005;

2007, No. 69

, § 1;

2007, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 16, 2008;

2007, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 28, 2008;

2013, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 27, 2014;

2017, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.